Utah statutes.
29-2-105.   Restitution.

In addition to any other penalty a court may impose, a court may order:

(1)  a person who violates an innkeeper's rights under Section 29-2-103 to pay restitution:

(a)  for damages suffered by an innkeeper including the lodging establishment's loss of revenue resulting from the lodging establishment's inability to rent or lease the room during the time period the lodging establishment room is being repaired; and

(b)  to any person who is injured in person or property; and

(2)  a parent or legal guardian of a minor to pay restitution for damages resulting from any acts of the minor in violation of an innkeeper's rights under Section 29-2-103.

